Massachusetts, session 194th, H308.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
There shall be an industrial mill building revitalization task force to stimulate the re-
development, rehabilitation and revitalization of industrial mill buildings and surrounding areas
in the commonwealth. The task force shall: (i) review current laws and regulations beneficial the
revitalization of mill buildings and surrounding areas, including, but not limited to, federal and
state tax incentives and renewable energy production; (ii) create a list of existing mill buildings,
their locations, whether they are active or inactive and current uses, if applicable, in the
commonwealth; (iii) investigate potential new uses for mill buildings based on market conditions
that increase economic development; (iv) identify strategies to improve mill building energy
efficiency and prevent further structural and environmental degradation; (v) explore innovative
of 2

permitting processes, zoning regulations and building codes to encourage redevelopment; and
(vi) consider any other action in furtherance of its purpose.
(b) The task force shall consist of the secretary of housing and economic development, or
a designee, who shall serve as chair; the secretary of energy and environmental affairs, or a
designee; the chairs of the joint committee on economic development and emerging
technologies, or their designees; the director of Massachusetts Development Finance Agency, or
a designee; 2 members of the house of representatives who represent communities with mill
buildings, designated by the speaker of the house of representatives; 2 members of the senate
who represent communities with mill buildings, designated by the senate president; the director
of the Massachusetts clean energy center, or a designee; 2 residents of the commonwealth who
own mill buildings, 1 active and 1 inactive, designated by the chair; 1 representative of a
Massachusetts utility company, designated by the chair; 1 representative from an economic
development organization, designated by the chair; 3 representatives of Massachusetts planning
organizations, 1 of whom shall be from the western region of the state, 1 of whom shall be from
the central region of the state and 1 of whom shall be from the eastern region of the state,
designated by the chair.
(c) The task force shall submit its report and recommendations, together with drafts of
legislation to carry its recommendations into effect, to the chairs of the joint committee on
economic development and emerging technologies and the clerks of the house of representatives
and the senate not later than August 1, 2025.
of 2